Washington statutes.
RCW 19.77.090

Actions relating to registration—Service on secretary of state—Assessment—Set by rule.

The secretary of state shall be the agent for service of process in any action relating to the registration of any registrant who is at the time of such service a nonresident or a foreign firm, corporation, association, union, or other organization without a resident of this state designated as the registrant's agent for service of record with the secretary of state, or who cannot be found in this state, and service of process, pleadings and papers in such action made upon the secretary of state shall be held as due and sufficient process upon the registrant. The secretary of state shall charge and collect an assessment, as set by rule by the secretary of state, at the time of any service of process upon the secretary of state under this section. The assessment may be recovered as taxable costs by the party to the suit or action causing such service to be made if such party prevails in the suit or action. The assessment shall be deposited in the secretary of state's revolving fund.

[ 1994 c 287 s 5; 1982 c 35 s 184; 1955 c 211 s 9.]

NOTES:

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—Application—1982 c 35: See notes following RCW 43.07.160.